Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1506
Support; disabled person in independent living situation; eligibility requirements.

A disabled person in an independent living situation may be eligible to receive support pursuant to sections 68-1501 to 68-1519 if the person (1) is a resident of the State of Nebraska, (2) requires care to remain within an independent living situation, and (3) has insufficient income to provide for the total cost of such care.

Laws 1981, LB 389, § 6;

Laws 1985, LB 87, § 1.